Florida, session 2026, SB184.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âPresent subsections (5) and (6) of section 18 311.12, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 19 and (7), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to that 20 section, to read: 21 311.12âSeaport security.â 22 (5)âFIRE SAFETY.â 23 (a)âEach seaport subject to this section shall maintain an 24 onsite fire station under the authority of a fire department 25 recognized by the State Fire Marshal. 26 (b)âA fire department station must be staffed, equipped, 27 and operational 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. 28 (c)âA fire station must have a certified hazardous 29 materials response team capable of immediate deployment to any 30 incident on seaport property. 31 (d)âEach seaport subject to this section shall maintain a 32 minimum of two operational fireboats, equipped and staffed to 33 respond to fires and hazardous materials incidents occurring on 34 or adjacent to navigable waters of the seaport. 35 (e)âThe Division of State Fire Marshal, in consultation 36 with the Florida Ports Council, shall adopt rules establishing 37 minimum standards for all of the following: 38 1.âStaffing levels and qualifications. 39 2.âEquipment and apparatus requirements, including 40 fireboats. 41 3.âTraining, including hazardous materials certification. 42 4.âMutual aid coordination with adjacent jurisdictions and 43 regional response teams. 44 (f)âA seaportâs failure to comply with this subsection may 45 result in fines imposed by the Department of Financial Services, 46 ineligibility for state port funding, or suspension of port 47 operations, as determined by the department. 48 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.